Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8568.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-1.7-6 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-1.7 entitled "Rhode
Island Program to Address Alzheimer’s Disease" is hereby amended to read as follows:
23-1.7-6. Healthcare facility plan.
(a) Every healthcare facility as defined in § 23-17-2 The following healthcare facilities
shall, not later than October 1, 2023 December 31, 2027, complete and implement an operational
plan for the recognition and management of patients with Alzheimer’s disease and related
disorders.:
(1) Nursing facilities;
(2) Hospitals serving adult populations, excluding hospitals that exclusively serve pediatric
patients; provided, however, that Bradley Hospital shall be exempt from the requirements of this
section;
(3) Home care and home nursing care providers;
(4) Organized ambulatory care settings that provide services to adults; provided, however,
that medical marijuana centers, CODAC facilities, and sleep centers shall be exempt from the
requirements of this section;
(5) Hospice care providers; and
(6) Rehabilitation hospital centers.
(b) The department of health shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement the

operational plan requirements of subsection (a).
(c) The director of the department of health, in consultation with the advisory council on
Alzheimer’s disease and related disorders, shall determine which healthcare facilities defined in §
23-17-2 will be subject to the requirements of subsection (a) of this section. The operational plan
required pursuant to this section shall include protocols for the following:
(1) Identifying the signs and symptoms of cognitive impairment, including diseases and
conditions that cause dementia;
(2) The management and treatment of residents or patients with neurocognitive disorders;
(3) Environmental considerations designed to optimize physical space and promote patient
safety;
(4) Transfers, referrals, and discharge planning to appropriate care settings;
(5) Training of clinical and non-clinical staff; and
(6) Advance care planning and resources for family members and caregivers.
(d) The operational plan shall be reviewed annually by the healthcare facility to ensure that
appropriate updates are made.
(e) The operational plan shall be maintained by the healthcare facility and made available
to the licensing agency upon request.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on January 1, 2027.

========
LC006469
========
LC006469 - Page 2 of 3